District of Columbia statutes.
46-302.10

Application of chapter to nonresident subject to personal jurisdiction.

A tribunal of the District exercising personal jurisdiction over a nonresident in a proceeding under this chapter, under other law of the District relating to a support order, or recognizing a support order of a foreign country or political subdivision on the basis of comity may receive evidence from another state pursuant to § 46-303.16, communicate with a tribunal of another state pursuant to § 46-303.17, and obtain discovery through a tribunal of another state pursuant to § 46-303.18. In all other respects, subchapters III through VII of this chapter do not apply and the tribunal shall apply the procedural and substantive law of the District.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 210
as added June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(b)(3)(E), 53 DCR 3634

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 210 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).